District of Columbia statutes.
47-825.03

Applicability of certain provisions; hearings open to public.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law, § 47-825.01(d)(5) [repealed], the second sentence of § 47-825.01(e) [repealed], and § 47-825.02 shall not apply until the Chief Financial Officer has determined that the implementation of those provisions will have no negative fiscal impact on the Office of Tax and Revenue, the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia, or on real property tax revenues collected by the District.

(b)

Except as provided in § 47-821(d)(2), hearings shall be open to the public.

(c)

This section shall expire upon notice to the Council by the Chief Financial Officer that he or she has made the determination required by subsection (a) of this section.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-236, § 2(a), 46 DCR 660
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 3(g)(6), 58 DCR 963
1981 Ed., § 47-825.3.
D.C. Law 18-363, in subsec. (a), substituted “Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia” for “Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals”.

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-363: Section 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, as added by D.C. Law 19-155, § 4, provided: “Sec. 3a. Applicability; transition.

“(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon Council approval and appointment by the Mayor of a full-time Chairperson and a full-time Vice Chairperson to the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall appoint the members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with the provisions of section 2(b)(3).”